interface/mni-fonipa/morph_mni-fonipa.lexd
PATTERNS
stem+ suffix stem suffix+ enclitic
prefix stem+ suffix+ enclitic
prefix stem+ enclitic suffix enclitic
phrase
suffix
prefix stem prefix stem+ suffix enclitic
prefix stem prefix stem suffix enclitic+
stem+ enclitic stem+ enclitic
prefix stem suffix stem suffix stem suffix enclitic+
stem suffix stem suffix+ enclitic+
stem prefix stem+ enclitic suffix+
stem suffix stem+ enclitic
stem suffix stem suffix+
stem+ suffix stem suffix+
stem suffix+ enclitic stem suffix
prefix stem
stem+ suffix stem+ suffix
stem suffix+ prefix stem enclitic
stem suffix enclitic+ suffix
stem+ prefix stem enclitic+
prefix stem suffix enclitic suffix
stem+ suffix enclitic suffix
stem suffix enclitic stem suffix
prefix stem suffix+ enclitic
stem+ suffix stem suffix
prefix stem+ suffix enclitic+
prefix stem prefix stem
enclitic
stem suffix+ enclitic stem suffix+
stem+ suffix stem
stem suffix stem
prefix enclitic prefix stem
stem+ suffix
stem enclitic+
stem suffix enclitic stem enclitic
stem suffix enclitic
prefix stem suffix enclitic
stem suffix stem enclitic
prefix stem suffix stem suffix
prefix stem enclitic
stem suffix+ stem suffix+
stem suffix+ stem suffix
prefix enclitic+
prefix stem enclitic prefix stem
prefix enclitic stem enclitic
stem suffix prefix stem suffix
stem enclitic prefix stem suffix
stem suffix+ stem enclitic
stem+ enclitic+ suffix+
stem enclitic
stem+ enclitic
stem+ suffix+ enclitic
stem+ suffix+ enclitic+
stem suffix+ stem suffix stem suffix stem+ suffix enclitic
stem+ enclitic+ suffix
stem suffix enclitic suffix+
stem suffix+ enclitic stem
stem suffix stem suffix enclitic
stem suffix enclitic stem suffix enclitic+
stem+ suffix enclitic suffix enclitic+
stem prefix stem suffix
stem enclitic suffix+ enclitic
stem enclitic stem
stem enclitic stem suffix
stem+ suffix stem enclitic
stem enclitic stem+ suffix+
prefix stem prefix stem enclitic+
stem enclitic stem suffix enclitic+
prefix stem+ suffix enclitic
stem+
stem suffix stem+
stem suffix enclitic+ infix
prefix stem prefix stem enclitic suffix
prefix stem enclitic suffix
stem enclitic suffix enclitic+
stem prefix stem enclitic
prefix enclitic+ suffix
prefix suffix+
stem suffix+ enclitic suffix
prefix enclitic+ suffix+
stem suffix enclitic suffix
stem enclitic suffix
stem suffix enclitic suffix enclitic+
stem enclitic stem suffix+ enclitic
prefix enclitic suffix
stem+ enclitic+
stem
prefix stem+ suffix
stem+ suffix+
stem+ enclitic suffix
stem suffix stem+ suffix+
prefix stem prefix stem suffix enclitic
stem suffix+ enclitic stem suffix enclitic
stem suffix enclitic stem suffix enclitic
prefix
stem suffix+ enclitic+ suffix
stem suffix enclitic suffix enclitic
stem+ prefix stem
stem suffix+ stem
stem enclitic suffix+
stem suffix stem suffix enclitic+
suffix+
stem+ suffix stem enclitic suffix
stem enclitic suffix enclitic
prefix enclitic prefix enclitic
stem enclitic stem suffix+ enclitic+
stem+ suffix enclitic
stem suffix enclitic stem
stem enclitic stem enclitic
stem suffix+ enclitic suffix+
prefix stem+
prefix stem prefix stem suffix
prefix stem enclitic suffix+
stem suffix stem suffix+ enclitic
stem enclitic suffix stem
enclitic+ suffix
stem suffix+ enclitic+
stem prefix stem enclitic suffix enclitic
enclitic+
stem enclitic stem suffix enclitic suffix
stem+ suffix enclitic stem
prefix stem suffix stem enclitic
stem enclitic stem suffix+
stem suffix stem suffix
stem suffix stem suffix stem suffix stem suffix
stem+ prefix stem enclitic suffix
stem suffix stem enclitic+
prefix stem+ suffix+
stem prefix stem
prefix stem suffix+
stem suffix+
stem enclitic stem suffix enclitic
stem suffix
prefix stem suffix enclitic+
stem suffix+ enclitic suffix infix
prefix stem enclitic suffix enclitic
stem+ enclitic stem
stem suffix+ enclitic suffix enclitic
prefix stem suffix enclitic+ suffix
stem suffix prefix stem
prefix stem suffix+ enclitic+
stem suffix+ stem enclitic+
prefix stem enclitic+
prefix stem enclitic infix
prefix stem suffix
prefix stem+ enclitic+
stem enclitic+ suffix
prefix stem prefix stem enclitic
stem+ suffix stem suffix enclitic+
stem+ suffix+ stem suffix
stem+ suffix enclitic+
stem suffix+ enclitic
stem+ suffix stem suffix enclitic
prefix stem enclitic+ stem
stem+ suffix+ enclitic suffix
prefix stem+ enclitic
prefix enclitic
stem suffix enclitic+
prefix stem enclitic prefix stem enclitic
prefix suffix
